Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202643-1524
Tribal customary adoption; department; rules and regulations; Supreme Court; rules and forms.

(1) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 43-1505.02 and 43-1518 to 43-1523 and the changes to other sections made by Laws 2026, LB1032.

(2) The Supreme Court may adopt rules and forms to assist in the carrying out of sections 43-1505.02 and 43-1518 to 43-1523 and the changes to other sections made by Laws 2026, LB1032.

Laws 2026, LB1032, § 29.
July 18, 2026